Massachusetts, session 194th, H3885.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6B of chapter 115 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following paragraph:-
"The surviving spouse, currently not married, who is in receipt of Dependency Indemnity
Compensation from the Veterans Administration, and whose veteran-spouse served in active
service of the armed forces of the United States, shall also be paid the sum of $1,500 annually in
two payments on August 1 and February 1. Such payments shall be due and payable from the
date of receipt of said surviving spouses completed application."
of 1